dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
SET ISO8859-15
TRY aeioàéèêîâsinrtlcdugmphbyfvkwôûëöïùœ

PFX R Y 2
PFX R   0     re          [^aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
PFX R   0     ré          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]

PFX D Y 1
PFX D   0     dé          .

PFX N Y 1
PFX N   0     n'          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]

PFX T Y 3
PFX T   0     l'          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
PFX T   0     m'          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
PFX T   0     t'          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]

PFX P Y 3
PFX P   0     m'          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
PFX P   0     t'          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
PFX P   0     s'          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]

PFX L Y 2
PFX L   0     d'          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
PFX L   0     l'          [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]

PFX Q Y 4
PFX Q   0     qu'         [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
PFX Q   0     quoiqu'     [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
PFX Q   0     quelqu'     [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
PFX Q   0     puisqu'     [aàâeèéêiîoôuh]
