dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
abjuraient/NT
abominant/NT
abordassent/T
aborder/LT
abordez/T
abouchaient/NPT
abouchasse/NPTX
abouchassent/NPT
abouchassiez/NPT
abouchent/NPT
aboulaient/NPT
aboulassent/NPT
aboule/NPTX
aboulent/NPT
abouler/ANPT
aboutir/BN
abrasait/NT
abreuvaient/NPT
abreuvait/NPT
abreuvassent/NPT
abreuvassiez/NPT
abreuvent/NPT
abrégeassiez/T
absenta/PS
absentant/P
absentassions/P
abâtardi/NPSTX
abêtir/BNPT
accidentassions/NT
accointa/NPS
accointait/NP
accointant/NP
accointassions/NP
accompli/NPSTX
accomplir/LNPT
accompliraient/NPT
accomplirez/NPT
accompliriez/NPT
accomplissaient/NPT
accomplisse/NPTX
accomplissions/NPT
accomplîmes/NPT
accomplît/NPT
accordaient/NPT
accordassent/NPT
accordent/NPT
accotai/NPST
accotaient/NPT
accotassent/NPT
accotent/NPT
accouasse/NTX
accouent/NT
accoutumassiez/R
acculturasse/NTX
accès/L
achalandaient/NT
achalandassions/NT
achemina/NPST
acheminant/NPT
acheminassent/NPT
acheminassions/NPT
acheminer/LNPT
acheminera/NPST
acheminerez/NPT
achemineront/NPT
acheminiez/NPT
acheminons/NPT
acheminèrent/NPT
actualisassiez/R
adaptation/LR
adapter/LR
adaptâmes/R
affadi/NPSTX
affermi/NPSTX
affranchi/NPSTX
agissaient/R
agrandi/NPSTX
agrandir/LNPT
agrandira/NPST
agrandiraient/NPT
agrandiriez/NPT
agrandissaient/NPT
agrandisse/NPTX
agrandissez/NPT
agrandissions/NPT
agrandît/NPT
ahuri/NSTX
aigri/NPSTX
ait/NR
ajustement/LR
alourdi/NPSTX
alésai/RS
aminci/NPSTX
amincir/BNPT
amoindri/NSTX
amorti/NPSTX
animassiez/R
anéanti/NPSTX
aplati/NPSTX
aplatir/BNPT
apparut/R
appesanti/NPSTX
approfondi/NPSTX
approvisionnassent/R
arrange/RX
assagi/NPSTX
assainir/BNT
assombri/NPSTX
assortirait/R
assoupi/NPSTX
assoupli/NPSTX
assujetti/NPSTX
assuraient/R
assurance/LR
attendri/NPSTX
attiédi/NPSTX
automatisation/L
avancement/L
avenir/L
averti/NSTX
avertir/BNT
aveuli/NPSTX
avis/L
bandassiez/D
baptisassions/DR
bardaient/D
battions/DR
biffant/R
blatèrent/D
bobinassions/DR
boiser/ADR
bosselant/D
bouchait/DR
boucherait/DR
bourrai/DS
boutassent/DR
boutonnassions/DR
bridaient/D
brouillassions/D
brûlai/RS
busquait/D
bâcher/AD
bâtassiez/D
bâtirions/R
cadenassasse/DX
calaminant/D
calassions/DR
calquant/D
capelai/DS
capote/DX
carbonatant/D
carrelant/DR
causaient/DR
celaient/DR
cent/DS
cerclant/DR
cercler/ADR
chaperonna/DS
chassant/R
chaumassent/D
chiffonnaient/D
chlorurassiez/D
christianisa/DRS
clama/DS
classassions/DR
clavetassiez/D
clouasse/DRX
cochât/D
coiffait/DR
collai/DRS
colletassiez/D
commandait/DR
commande/DRX
compléter/AD
comprimasse/DX
comptent/DR
concerta/DS
conduisiez/R
congelassent/D
connut/R
conseillait/D
considéraient/DR
considérant/DR
constitution/RS
contenance/D
convertirait/R
cordai/DRS
cordant/DR
couchassions/DR
couchez/DR
coupa/DRS
courions/R
couronnasse/DX
couvrais/DR
couvrirai/DRS
cracher/AR
crie/DX
croisaient/D
crotter/AD
créasse/RX
crépitaient/D
cueillit/R
cuivrent/D
cuvassent/D
cèdent/DR
descendirent/R
deviendra/RS
diffusant/R
différenciaient/D
discutassiez/R
dommage/DX
donnant/R
doubler/ADR
dramatisasse/DX
découvre/RX
définissais/R
embauchassions/R
embauche/LR
embelli/NPSTX
employés/LR
empruntasse/RX
en/N
enamoura/NPS
enamourant/NP
enamourassions/NP
endolori/NSTX
endolorir/BNT
endurci/NPSTX
englouti/NPSTX
enhardi/NPSTX
ennoblir/BNT
enorgueilli/NPSTX
ensemence/RX
enseveli/NPSTX
essayait/R
expliquent/N
exportent/R
fatigua/DS
favorisait/D
façonnait/R
fendue/DX
ferrent/D
fiasse/DX
ficelai/DRS
filant/DSX
firent/DR
flue/RX
formait/DR
foulassions/DR
fouler/ADR
fraîchiront/D
froissa/DS
gainasse/DX
gardasse/RX
gazonnaient/DR
gazonnent/DR
gonfle/DRX
gorge/DRX
grade/DX
greffassiez/R
grouillasse/DX
gréai/DRS
habituassions/R
halassent/D
implantasse/RX
implantation/LR
importation/LR
impose/RX
incarnait/R
infecter/AR
inscription/LR
insertion/LR
installait/R
installation/LR
installer/LR
insérai/RS
intervertir/BNT
introduction/LR
introduisit/R
intégration/LR
inverti/NSTX
investirai/RS
inviter/AR
isolation/L
jaunisse/DX
joignait/R
jointoieront/R
lacer/AD
laierons/DR
lançaient/R
lavant/DR
layassions/DR
lice/D
livrai/DS
logeait/DR
légua/DRS
léguer/ADR
marchant/R
mariassions/DR
matérialiser/AD
mettrez/DR
mettrons/DR
mobilisai/DS
montent/DR
monétise/DX
moulage/DX
mythifier/AD
mâcher/AR
nationalisai/DS
nichant/D
nommassent/DR
noua/DRS
nucléariser/AD
obscurci/NPSTX
optimisation/L
ordonnai/RS
organisation/LR
orientation/LR
ouverture/LR
paraît/R
partageassions/DR
partir/DR
peignassiez/DR
peignent/DR
personnalisent/D
peuplant/DR
place/DRX
plaça/DRS
plaçâmes/DR
ployait/DR
plâtrai/DRS
politisait/D
poétisa/DS
prendrions/R
prolétarisai/DS
présenter/AR
racinait/D
raisonnait/D
rivassions/D
routassions/D
scinda/RS
scolarisassions/D
stabilisateur/DS
surgissais/R
synchronisent/DR
tardant/R
teignant/D
terre/DX
tissaient/R
tournai/DRS
traduis/R
transforma/RS
trempait/DR
trompasse/DX
téléphonassent/R
univers/L
utilisant/NR
utilisation/LR
utiliser/LNR
utiliserions/NR
utiliseront/NR
valorise/DRX
vendirent/R
viendriez/R
vissai/DRS
vola/RS
vêtent/DR
ébarbant/NT
ébarbent/NT
ébaubi/PSX
ébavurassions/NT
éberluaient/NT
ébloui/NSTX
éborgnant/NT
ébouillanta/NPST
ébouillantaient/NPT
ébouillantant/NPT
ébouillantassions/NPT
éboula/NPST
éboulant/NPT
éboulassent/NPT
éboulassions/NPT
ébourgeonna/NST
ébourgeonnent/NT
ébouriffasse/NTX
ébourrait/NT
ébourre/NTX
éboutassiez/NT
ébranchai/NST
ébrancher/ANT
ébrasasse/NTX
ébroua/NPS
ébrouait/NP
ébrouant/NP
ébrouassions/NP
écachassiez/NT
écache/NTX
écailla/NPST
écaillant/NPT
écala/NPST
écalai/NPST
écalaient/NPT
écale/NPTX
écanguant/NT
écanguassent/NT
échalassassions/NT
échalassent/NT
écharna/NST
écharnaient/NT
écharpant/NT
écharpassent/NT
échaudassions/NT
échaudent/NT
échina/NPST
échinaient/NPT
échinasse/NPTX
échoppant/NT
échoppassent/NT
éclaircir/LNPT
éclairciriez/NPT
éclaircirions/NPT
éclaircirons/NPT
éclaircissent/NPT
éclaircît/NPT
éclaircîtes/NPT
éclopa/NST
éclusaient/NT
éclusant/NT
écopassent/NT
écopassions/NT
écornent/NT
écornifla/NST
écossaient/NT
écossant/NT
écoutaient/R
écrabouillassent/NT
écrabouillassions/NT
écrivassent/N
écroûtent/NT
écrêta/NST
écuissaient/NT
écuissant/NT
éculassent/NT
éculassions/NT
écumer/ANT
écœurai/NST
édentant/NT
édentassent/NT
édition/LR
édulcore/NTX
édulcorer/ANT
éduquassiez/R
égalai/NST
égalait/NT
égales/LNT
égermasse/NTX
égermassiez/NT
égosillassiez/NP
égosiller/ANP
égrappe/NTX
égrisait/NT
égueulai/NST
égueulassiez/NT
éjaculasse/NTX
éjaculer/ANT
éjointe/NTX
élargir/LNPT
élargirai/NPST
élargiront/NPT
élargissais/NPT
élargissiez/NPT
électricité/L
électrocutait/NT
électrocute/NTX
électrolysassiez/NT
élidai/NST
élider/ANT
élimai/NPST
élimasse/NPTX
élime/NPTX
éliminait/NT
élimine/NTX
éliminer/LNT
éliminerons/NT
éliminâmes/NT
élinguasse/NTX
élinguer/ANT
élucubre/NTX
émanai/NS
émancipasse/NPTX
émancipassions/NPT
émanciper/ANPT
émascule/NTX
émerisait/NT
émigrai/NS
émondassent/NT
émondassiez/NT
émorfilent/NT
émorfiler/ANT
émoussai/NPST
émoussaient/NPT
émoussait/NPT
émousse/NPTX
émulsionnassent/NT
émulsionnassiez/NT
énamourasse/NPX
énamourer/ANP
épaissi/NPSTX
épaissir/BNPT
épamprai/NST
épannaient/NT
épannasse/NTX
épaufrant/NT
épaufrassiez/NT
éperonnassions/NT
épeura/NST
épiloguai/NST
épiloguant/NT
épinasse/NTX
épinassions/NT
épisse/NTX
épointa/NST
épontillai/NST
épontillant/NT
épouillasse/NTX
épouillassions/NT
époustouflent/NT
épépinai/NST
équerra/NST
équerrait/NT
équivoquassiez/N
éraillant/NPT
éraillasse/NPTX
érailler/ANPT
érodai/NPST
érodassions/NPT
érode/NPTX
érotisait/NT
éructa/NST
éructassiez/NT
établant/NT
établir/LNPT
établirait/NPT
établiriez/NPT
établissais/NPT
établissant/NPT
établissons/NPT
établît/NPT
étampaient/NT
étampassiez/NT
étançonnassent/NT
étarquer/ANT
éternuait/N
étoilait/NPT
étoiler/ANPT
étoiles/LNPT
étoupillassent/NT
étrillassions/NT
étripant/NPT
étriqua/NST
étronçonnant/NT
étréci/NSTX
étrésillonnassent/NT
étuvent/NT
étêtassent/NT
évalua/LRS
évaluai/LRS
évaluaient/LR
évaluait/LR
évaluant/LR
évaluasse/LRX
évaluassent/LR
évaluassiez/LR
évaluassions/LR
évaluation/LR
évalue/LRX
évaluent/LR
évaluer/ALR
évangélisaient/NT
évanoui/NPSX
éventassent/NPT
éventra/NST
éventrent/NT
évitait/NT
évite/NTX
évitement/L
éviter/LNT
éviterons/NT
